Utah statutes.
79-4-201.   Division of Parks and Recreation -- Creation -- Powers and authority.

(1)  There is created within the department the Division of Parks and Recreation.

(2)  The division is under:

(a)  the administration and general supervision of the executive director; and

(b)  the policy direction of the board.

(3)  The division is the parks and recreation authority for the state.

